test/src/morphology/N-juur_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jūŗ: # Noun 221 'eng /est juur/fin' - full paradigm
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Nom: jūŗ
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Gen: jūr
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Par: jūrtõ
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Dat: jūrõn
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Ins: jūrkõks
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Ill: jūrõ
     jūŗ+N+Sg+Ela: jūrstõ
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Nom: jūrd
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Gen: jūrd
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Par: jūŗi
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Dat: jūrdõn
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Ins: jūrdkõks
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Ill: jūŗiž
     jūŗ+N+Pl+Ela: jūŗšti
